Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.120

Rural arterial trust account—Matching funds.

Counties receiving funds from the rural arterial trust account for construction of arterials and the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas shall provide such matching funds as established by rules recommended by the board, subject to review, revision, and final approval by the office of financial management. Matching requirements shall be established after appropriate studies by the board, taking into account financial resources available to counties to meet arterial needs.

[ 2006 c 334 s 11; 1988 c 26 s 6; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 334: See note following RCW 47.01.051.